Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2374.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 11, chapter 6, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-813.01, to read: START_STATUTE11-813.01. Planning and zoning commissioners; conflict of interest; recusal; definition A. Any commissioner who has, or whose relative has, a substantial interest in any of the land or improvement to the land that is the subject of an action before the commission shall make known that interest in the official records of the commission and shall refrain from voting on or otherwise participating in any manner as a commissioner in any action BEFORE the commission on that land or improvement to the land. B. For the purposes of this section, "substantial interest" has the same meaning prescribed in section 38-502. END_STATUTE